District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2105.02

Nonprofit housing developments — Forgiveness of outstanding charges.

Repealed.

History

June 4, 1982, D.C. Law 4-112, § 6, 29 DCR 1687
repealed pursuant to § 305 of D.C. Law 11-111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1605.2.

Editor's Notes

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 305 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.